Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-2505
Governing body, defined.

Governing body means the city council or village board of trustees of any municipality subject to the Municipal Initiative and Referendum Act.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 168.
August 28, 2021